pl: Zliczane metryki: Frekwencja; Piłki; Inningi; Okrążenia; Auty; Overy; Narzuty; Straiki; Wickety; Inne
vi: Các chỉ số được tính toán: Số người tham dự; Bóng; Hiệp; Vòng đua; Lượt loại; Over; Lượt ném; Strike; Wicket; Khác
ro-RO: Număr de măsurători: Prezență; Mingi; Reprize; Ture; Eliminări; Over-uri; Aruncări; Strike-uri; Wicket-uri; Altele
en: Metrics counted: Attendance; Balls; Innings; Laps; Outs; Overs; Pitches; Strikes; Wickets; Other
fr: Mesures comptabilisées: Présence; Balles; Manches; Tours; Retraits; Overs; Lancers; Prises; Guichets; Autre
ja: 計測された指標: 入場者数; ボール; イニング; ラップ; アウト; オーバー; 投球数; ストライク; ウィケット; その他
hu: Nyomon követett értékek: Nézőszám; Ball (rossz dobás); Játékrészek (inning); Körök; Kiesések (out); Overek; Dobások (pitch); Strike-ok; Kapuk (wicket); Egyéb
it: Metriche rilevate: Presenze; Ball; Inning; Giri; Eliminazioni; Over; Lanci; Strike; Wicket; Altro
nl: Getelde statistieken: Aanwezigheid; Ballen; Innings; Rondes; Outs; Overs; Worpen; Strikes; Wickets; Overige
zh-TW: 計數指標: 出席人數; 壞球; 局數; 圈數; 出局數; 輪數; 投球數; 好球; 三柱門; 其他
ru: Отслеживаемые метрики: Посещаемость; Болы; Иннинги; Круги; Ауты; Оверы; Подачи; Страйки; Уикеты; Другое
th: ตัวชี้วัดที่นับได้: การเข้าร่วม; บอล; อินนิง; รอบ; เอาต์; โอเวอร์; พิตช์; สไตรก์; วิกเก็ต; อื่นๆ
ko: 측정 지표: 관중 수; 볼; 이닝; 랩; 아웃; 오버; 투구 수; 스트라이크; 위켓; 기타
de: Gezählte Kennzahlen: Besucherzahl; Bälle; Innings; Runden; Outs; Overs; Pitches; Strikes; Wickets; Sonstiges
bg-BG: Броени метрики: Посещаемост; Топки; Ининги; Обиколки; Аутове; Оувъри; Хвърляния; Страйкове; Уикети; Друго
pt-PT: Métrica contada: Presenças; Bolas; Entradas; Voltas; Eliminações; Overs; Lançamentos; Strikes; Wickets; Outro
hr-HR: prebrojani mjerni podaci: Posjećenost; Loptice; Innings; Krugovi; Outs; Overs; Bacanja; Strikes; Wickets; Ostalo
da: Optalte metrikværdier: Tilskuertal; Bolde; Innings; Omgange; Outs; Overs; Kast; Strikes; Wickets; Andet
cs: Započítané metriky: Návštěvnost; Míče; Směny; Kola; Auty; Overy; Nadhozy; Strajky; Branky; Jiné
lt-LT: Skaičiuojami rodikliai: Lankomumas; Klaidingi metimai (balls); Kėliniai (innings); Ratai; Iškritimai (outs); Serijos (overs); Metimai; Taiklūs metimai (strikes); Varteliai; Kita
sl-SI: Štete metrike: Prisotnost; Žogice; Inningi; Krogi; Izločitve; Overji; Meti; Strajki; Wicketi; Drugo
sk-SK: Počítané metriky: Účasť; Lopty; Zmeny; Kolá; Auty; Overy; Nadhadzovania; Straiky; Bránky; Iné
es: Métricas contabilizadas: Asistencia; Bolas; Entradas; Vueltas; Outs; Overs; Lanzamientos; Strikes; Wickets; Otro
nb: Visning av takt/metrum: Oppmøte; Baller; Innings; Runder; Outs; Overs; Kast; Strikes; Wickets; Annet
zh-CN: 统计指标: 上座人数; 坏球数; 局数; 圈数; 出局数; 轮数; 投球数; 好球数; 三柱门数; 其他
tr: Sayılan metrikler: Katılım; Toplar; İningler; Turlar; Out'lar; Over'lar; Atışlar; Strike'lar; Wicket'lar; Diğer
el: Μετρούμενες τιμές: Προσέλευση; Balls; Innings; Γύροι; Outs; Overs; Pitches; Strikes; Wickets; Άλλο
fi: Laskettavat arvot: Yleisömäärä; Väärät; Vuoroparit; Kierrokset; Palot; Syöttövuorot; Syötöt; Suorat; Hilat; Muu
pt-BR: Métricas contabilizadas: Público; Bolas; Entradas; Voltas; Eliminações; Overs; Arremessos; Strikes; Wickets; Outro
sv: Spårade mätvärden: Närvaro; Bollar; Inningar; Varv; Bränningar; Overs; Kast; Strikes; Grindar; Annat